Utah statutes.
63G-12-209.   Proficiency standards for English.

(1)  A permit holder shall in good faith use best efforts to become proficient in the English language at or above the equivalent to an intermediate level on a language proficiency assessment test used by the State Office of Education for purposes of secondary school students.

(2)  An undocumented individual shall pay the costs of complying with this section.

